Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.11, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Annual evaluation. (a) The commissioner must identify effective strategies, practices, and use of resources by districts and school sites in striving for comprehensive achievement and civic readiness. The commissioner must assist districts and sites throughout the state in implementing these effective strategies, practices, and use of resources. (b) The commissioner must identify those districts in any consecutive three-year period not making sufficient progress toward improving teaching and learning for all students, including English learners with varied needs, consistent with section 124D.59, subdivisions 2 and 2a, and striving for comprehensive achievement and civic readiness. The commissioner, in collaboration with the identified district, may require the district to use up to two percent of its basic general education revenue per fiscal year during the proximate three school years to implement commissioner-specified strategies and practices, consistent with paragraph (a), to improve and accelerate its progress in realizing its goals under this section. In implementing this section, the commissioner must consider districts' budget constraints and legal obligations. (c) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end report by January 25 of each year to the committees of the legislature having jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education the list of school districts that have not submitted their report to the commissioner under subdivision 5 and the list of school districts not achieving their performance goals established in their plan under subdivision 2. new text begin (d) The commissioner must annually select no fewer than 15 percent of school districts for a curriculum audit to determine alignment with state academic standards in math and language arts. The commissioner must select the school districts to be audited from the list of districts under paragraph (c) or districts with schools identified for improvement under this section or in accordance with the state plan adopted under the most recent reauthorization of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act. new text end